North Carolina statutes. Chapter 18B. Regulation of Alcoholic Beverages.
Article 11. Commercial Activity.
§ 18B-1114.5.
Authorization of malt beverage special event permit.

Authorization. — The holder of a brewery permit, a malt beverages importer permit, a brewing, distillation, and fermentation course authorization, a nonresident malt beverage vendor permit, or a vendor representative permit may obtain a malt beverage special event permit allowing the permittee to give free tastings of its malt beverages; to sell branded merchandise such as glassware, cups, signs, t-shirts, hats, and other apparel; and to sell its malt beverages by the glass or in closed containers at shopping malls and at trade shows, conventions, malt beverage festivals, street festivals, holiday festivals, agricultural festivals, farmers markets, balloon races, local fund-raisers, and other similar events approved by the Commission. Except for a brewery operating under the provisions of G.S. 18B-1104(a)(8), all malt beverages sampled or sold pursuant to this section must be purchased from a licensed malt beverages wholesaler.

Limitation. — A malt beverage special event permit is valid only in a jurisdiction that has approved the establishment of ABC stores or has approved the sale of malt beverages. A malt beverage special event shall not be used as subterfuge for malt beverages suppliers to ship directly to retail permittees unless otherwise authorized by law.

History.

2009-377, s. 4; 2014-115, s. 28.2(b); 2014-120, s. 17(b); 2017-87, s. 16(e); 2018-100, s. 6(b); 2019-182, s. 9; 2021-150, s. 6.2(f).

§ 18B-1114.6.
Brewing, Distillation, and Fermentation course authorization.

Authorization. — The holder of a brewing, distillation, and fermentation course authorization may:

Manufacture malt beverages on the school’s campus or the school’s contracted or leased property for the purpose of providing instruction and education on the making of malt beverages.

Possess malt beverages manufactured during the brewing, distillation, and fermentation program for the purpose of conducting malt beverage tasting seminars and classes for students who are 21 years of age or older.

Sell malt beverages produced during the course to wholesalers or to retailers upon obtaining a malt beverages wholesaler permit under

G.S. 18B-1109

, except that the permittee may not receive shipments of malt beverages from other producers.

Sell malt beverages produced during the course, upon obtaining a permit under

G.S. 18B-1001(2)

.

Limitation. — Authorization for a brewing, distillation, and fermentation course shall be granted by the Commission only for a community college or college that offers a brewing, distillation, and fermentation program as a part of its curriculum offerings for students of the school. For purposes of this section, the term “brewing, distillation, and fermentation program” includes a fermentation sciences program offered by a community college or college as part of its curriculum offerings for students of the school.

Malt Beverage Special Event Permit. — The holder of a brewing, distillation, and fermentation course authorization who obtains a malt beverages wholesaler permit under

G.S. 18B-1109

subject to the limitation in subsection (a) of this section may obtain a malt beverage special event permit under

G.S. 18B-1114.5

and where the permit is valid may participate in approved events and sell at retail at those events any malt beverages produced incident to the operation of the brewing, distillation, and fermentation program. The holder of a brewing, distillation, and fermentation course authorization may participate in not more than six malt beverage special events within a 12-month period and may sell up to 64 cases of malt beverages, or the equivalent volume of 64 cases of malt beverages, at each event. For purposes of this subsection, a “case of malt beverages” is a package containing not more than 24 12-ounce bottles of malt beverage. Net proceeds from the program’s retail sale of malt beverages pursuant to this subsection shall be retained by the school and used for support of the brewing, distillation, and fermentation program.

Limited Application. — The holder of a brewing, distillation, and fermentation course authorization shall not be considered a brewery for the purposes of this Chapter or Chapter 105 of the General Statutes.

History.

2014-120, s. 17(a).

§ 18B-1114.7.
Authorization of spirituous liquor special event permit.

Authorization. — The holder of a supplier representative permit, brokerage representative permit, nonresident spirituous liquor vendor permit, or distillery permit issued under

G.S. 18B-1105

may obtain a spirituous liquor special event permit allowing the permittee to give free tastings of its spirituous liquors at ABC stores where the local board has approved the tasting, at shopping malls or at trade shows, conventions, street festivals, holiday festivals, agricultural festivals, balloon races, farmers markets, local fund-raisers, and other similar events approved by the Commission. Additionally, the holder of a spirituous liquor special event permit may sell mixed beverages or spirituous liquor distilled or produced at the distillery in closed containers at trade shows, conventions, agricultural festivals, farmers markets, local fund-raisers, and other similar events approved by the Commission.

General Limitations on Consumer Tastings. — Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, any consumer tasting is subject to the following limitations:

The permit holder or the permit holder’s authorized agent shall conduct the consumer tasting and the permit holder shall be solely responsible for any violations of this Chapter occurring in connection with the consumer tasting.

The spirituous liquor shall be poured only by either (i) the permit holder conducting the consumer tasting or (ii) an employee or authorized agent of the permit holder conducting the consumer tasting who is at least 21 years of age.

Each consumer shall be limited to one tasting sample containing 0.25 ounces of any product made available for sampling at the consumer tasting, and the total amount of the tasting samples offered to and consumed by each consumer shall not exceed 1.0 ounce of spirituous liquor in any calendar day.

(3a)

The permit holder or the permit holder’s authorized agent may only provide tasting samples of products from one distillery per booth, kiosk, or display.

The permit holder or the permit holder’s authorized agent shall not offer tasting samples to, or allow consumption of tasting samples by, any consumer who is visibly intoxicated.

The permit holder or the permit holder’s authorized agent shall not offer tasting samples to, or allow consumption of tasting samples by, any consumer under 21 years of age. The person pouring the spirituous liquor shall be responsible for verifying the age of the consumer being served by checking the identification of the consumer.

The permit holder shall not charge a consumer for any tasting sample.

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-182, s. 6(a), effective September 1, 2019.

A consumer tasting shall not be allowed unless the venue is located in a jurisdiction that has approved the sale of mixed beverages.

The permit holder may provide point-of-sale advertising materials and advertising specialties and may sell branded merchandise such as glassware, cups, signs, t-shirts, hats, and other apparel to consumers at the consumer tasting.

The permit holder shall maintain for a period of at least one year a record of each consumer tasting conducted. The record shall include the date of the consumer tasting, the time of the consumer tasting, an identification of the venue at which the consumer tasting was held, an identification of the spirituous liquor that was provided for tasting at the consumer tasting, and the name of any person who poured spirituous liquor at the consumer tasting. The permit holder shall allow the ABC Commission to inspect those records at any time.

Consumer tastings may not be provided between the hours of 2:00 A.M. and 7:00 A.M., except that on Sundays consumer tastings may not be provided until 12:00 noon unless the sale of alcoholic beverages before 12:00 noon is authorized by local ordinance pursuant to

G.S. 153A-145.7

or

G.S. 160A-205.3

.

(b1)

General Limitations on Sales of Mixed Beverages. —

The sale of mixed beverages in conjunction with a consumer tasting under a spirituous liquor special event permit is subject to the following limitations:

(1)

The sale of mixed beverages in conjunction with a consumer tasting is not authorized at shopping malls, street festivals, holiday festivals, or balloon races.

(2)

The mixed beverages shall contain only spirituous liquor distilled or produced at the distillery.

(3)

The permit holder or the permit holder’s authorized agent shall conduct the sale of mixed beverages, and the permit holder shall be solely responsible for any violations of this Chapter occurring in connection with the event.

(4)

The permit holder or the permit holder’s authorized agent may only sell mixed beverages containing products from one distillery per booth, kiosk, or display.

(5)

The mixed beverage shall be prepared only by either (i) the permit holder or the permit holder’s authorized agent conducting the consumer tasting or (ii) an employee of the permit holder or the permit holder’s authorized agent conducting the consumer tasting who is at least 21 years of age.

(6)

The permit holder or the permit holder’s authorized agent shall not knowingly sell more than one mixed beverage to a customer per calendar day, per distillery.

(7)

The permit holder or the permit holder’s authorized agent shall not sell or serve mixed beverages to any consumer who is visibly intoxicated.

(8)

The permit holder or the permit holder’s authorized agent shall not sell or serve mixed beverages to any consumer under 21 years of age. The person preparing the mixed beverage shall be responsible for verifying the age of the consumer being served by checking the identification of the consumer.

(9)

The sale of mixed beverages shall not be allowed unless the venue is located in a jurisdiction that has approved the sale of mixed beverages.

(10)

Mixed beverages may not be sold between the hours of 2:00 A.M. and 7:00 A.M., except that on Sundays mixed beverages may not be sold until 12:00 noon unless otherwise authorized by local ordinance pursuant to

G.S. 153A-145.7

or

G.S. 160A-205.3

.

(b2)

General Limitations on the Provision of Spirituous Liquor in Closed Containers. —

The provision of spirituous liquor in closed 50 milliliter mini-bottle containers, at no cost, in conjunction with a consumer tasting under a spirituous liquor special event permit is authorized subject to the following limitations:

(1)

The permit holder or the permit holder’s authorized agent shall provide only spirituous liquor distilled or produced at the distillery.

(2)

The permit holder or the permit holder’s authorized agent shall conduct the provision of the spirituous liquor, and the permit holder shall be solely responsible for any violations of this Chapter occurring in connection with the event.

(3)

The permit holder or the permit holder’s authorized agent may only provide spirituous liquor distilled or produced by one distillery per booth, kiosk, or display.

(4)

The spirituous liquor shall be provided only by either (i) the permit holder or the permit holder’s authorized agent conducting the consumer tasting or (ii) an employee of the permit holder or the permit holder’s authorized agent conducting the consumer tasting who is at least 21 years of age.

(5)

The permit holder or the permit holder’s authorized agent shall not knowingly provide more than one 50 milliliter mini-bottle of spirituous liquor to a customer per calendar day, per distillery. Notwithstanding G.S. 18B-301(e), a customer may possess a mini-bottle purchased at a consumer tasting event while at the event.

(6)

The permit holder or the permit holder’s authorized agent shall not provide spirituous liquor to any consumer who is visibly intoxicated.

(7)

The permit holder or the permit holder’s authorized agent shall not provide spirituous liquor to any consumer under 21 years of age. The person providing the spirituous liquor shall be responsible for verifying the age of the consumer being served by checking the identification of the consumer.

(8)

The provision of spirituous liquor shall not be allowed unless the venue is located in a jurisdiction that has approved the sale of mixed beverages.

(9)

Spirituous liquor in closed containers may be provided between the hours of 9:00 A.M. and 9:00 P.M. on Monday through Saturday of each week, from 12:00 noon to 9:00 P.M. on Sundays, and from 9:00 A.M. to 9:00 P.M. on each of the following holidays that do not fall on a Sunday: New Year’s Day, Fourth of July, Labor Day, and Thanksgiving Day.

Additional Limitations on Tastings in ABC Stores. — Consumer tastings conducted in an ABC store shall have the following additional limitations:

The spirituous liquor used in the consumer tasting event shall be purchased by the permit holder from any ABC store at the price set by the Commission. The permit holder shall remove from the premises any remaining spirituous liquor used in the consumer tasting event at the conclusion of the consumer tasting event.

(1a)

The permit shall be issued in the name of the distillery or, if issued to a supplier representative, brokerage representative, or nonresident spirituous liquor vendor, in the name of the nonresident spirituous liquor vendor or the name of the business the supplier representative or brokerage representative represents.

A local board may allow consumer tasting events to be conducted only between the hours of 1:00 P.M. and 7:00 P.M. on any day the ABC store, where the consumer tasting event is being held, is authorized by law to sell spirituous liquor. No consumer tasting event shall be conducted for more than three hours.

The local board shall limit the consumer tasting events allowed per ABC store as follows:

No more than three consumer tasting events may be held per calendar week.

No more than two different permit holders may conduct a consumer tasting event at the same time.

Notwithstanding subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section, the total amount of the tasting samples offered to and consumed by each consumer at a consumer tasting event shall not exceed one-half ounce of spirituous liquor in any calendar day.

The permit holder conducting the event may provide point-of-sale advertising materials and advertising specialties to consumers at the consumer tasting event, but shall not conduct any sales of any branded merchandise or apparel to consumers at the consumer tasting event.

The local board may post notice of the consumer tasting event at the local board’s administrative offices and at any of the ABC stores within the local board’s system and may provide notice of the consumer tasting event to any mixed beverage permittee that purchases spirituous liquor from an ABC store within the local board’s system. Except as permitted by this subdivision, no local board or permit holder shall advertise or promote the consumer tasting event to the public or cause any person to do so on its behalf.

The permit holder shall provide written notice of the consumer tasting event to the ABC Commission at least 48 hours before the consumer tasting event. The notice shall include all of the following:

The date and time of the consumer tasting event.

The ABC store at which the consumer tasting event will be conducted.

The spirituous liquor that will be provided for tasting at the consumer tasting event.

The Commission shall adopt rules to ensure that local ABC boards that choose to allow tastings provide holders of distillery permits issued under

G.S. 18B-1105

with reasonable opportunities to conduct tastings.

Any tasting conducted in an ABC store shall be the sole responsibility of the permit holder. No employee of a local board may participate in or conduct a tasting in an ABC store.

Any additional conditions imposed by the local board. Any additional conditions shall be in writing, and the local board shall post notice of the additional conditions at the local board’s administrative offices and provide a copy of that notice to any permit holder upon request.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a permit holder conducting a consumer tasting event pursuant to this section shall not provide any consideration to the local board, its board members, or its employees for any purpose related to the consumer tasting event. A consumer tasting event shall not be used by permit holders for unlawful inducements to a local board.

For purposes of this section, “distillery” means the holder of a distillery permit issued under

G.S. 18B-1105

or a business located outside the State that is licensed or permitted to manufacture spirituous liquor in the jurisdiction where the business is located and whose products are lawfully sold in this State.

History.

2017-87, s. 2(c); 2018-100, s. 6(c); 2019-182, s. 6(a); 2021-150, s. 6.2(g).

§ 18B-1115.
Commercial transportation.

Permit Required. — Unless a person holds a permit which otherwise allows him to transport more than 80 liters of malt beverages other than draft malt beverages in kegs, 50 liters of unfortified wine, or eight liters of fortified wine or spirituous liquor, or is a retailer authorized to transport alcoholic beverages under

G.S. 18B-405

, each person transporting alcoholic beverages in excess of those quantities shall have the permit described in this section.

When Transportation Legal. — No person may obtain a permit under this section to transport spirituous liquor unless the transportation is for delivery to a federal reservation over which North Carolina has ceded jurisdiction to the United States, for delivery to an ABC store, or for transport through this State to another state.

Common Carriers. — Railroad companies and other common carriers having regularly established schedules of service in this State may transport alcoholic beverages into, out of, and between points in this State without a permit. Those companies shall keep accurate records of the character, volume and number of containers transported and shall allow the Commission and alcohol law-enforcement agents to inspect those records at any time. The Commission may require common carriers to make reports of shipments.

Motor Vehicle Carriers. — Alcoholic beverages may be transported over the public highways of this State by motor vehicle carriers under the following conditions:

The carrier shall notify the Commission of the character of the alcoholic beverages it will transport and of its authorization from the appropriate regulatory authority.

The carrier shall obtain, at no charge, a fleet permit from the Commission authorizing the transportation.

The driver or person in charge of each vehicle transporting alcoholic beverages shall possess a copy of the carrier’s fleet permit certified by the carrier to be an exact copy of the original.

The driver or person in charge of each vehicle transporting alcoholic beverages shall possess a bill of lading, invoice or other memorandum of shipment showing the name and address of the person from whom the alcoholic beverages were received, the character and contents of the shipment, the quantity and volume of the shipment, and the name and address of the person to whom the alcoholic beverages are being shipped.

The driver or person in charge of each vehicle transporting the alcoholic beverages shall display all documents required by this section upon request of any law-enforcement officer. Failure to produce these documents or failure of the documents to disclose clearly and accurately the information required by this section shall be prima facie evidence of a violation of this section.

Each carrier shall keep accurate records of character, volume and number of containers transported and shall allow the Commission and alcohol law-enforcement agents to inspect those records at any time. The Commission may require carriers to make reports of shipments.

Transportation of Spirituous Liquor. — In addition to the requirements of subsection (d), motor vehicle carriers engaged in transporting spirituous liquor shall:

Deposit with the Commission a surety bond for one thousand dollars ($1,000) conditioned that the carrier will not unlawfully transport spirituous liquor into or through this State. The bond, which shall be approved by the Commission, shall be payable to the State of North Carolina. If the bonded carrier is convicted of a violation covered by the bond, the proceeds of the forfeited bond shall be paid to the school fund of the county in which the liquor was seized.

Include in its bill of lading, invoice or other memorandum of shipment the North Carolina code numbers of the spirituous liquor being transported.

Include in its bill of lading, invoice or other memorandum of shipment the route which the vehicle will follow, and the vehicle shall not vary substantially from that stated route.

Malt Beverages and Wine Transported by Boats. — The owner or operator of any boat may transport malt beverages, unfortified wine and fortified wine over the waters of this State if he satisfies all requirements of subsection (d).

State Warehouse Carrier. — The Commission may exempt a carrier for the State or a local board warehouse from any of the requirements of this section provided that it determines that the requirements of this section are otherwise satisfied.

History.

1923, c. 1, s. 15; C.S., s. 3411(o); 1939, c. 158, s. 503; 1971, c. 872, s. 1; 1975, c. 411, s. 7; 1977, c. 70, s. 20; c. 176, s. 7; 1979, c. 286, s. 5; 1981, c. 412, s. 2; c. 747, s. 63; 1987, c. 136, s. 9; 1989, c. 553, s. 4; 1993, c. 508, s. 7; 2005-335, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-335, s. 1, effective August 26, 2005, substituted “50” for “20” in subsection (a).

§ 18B-1116.
Exclusive outlets prohibited.

Prohibitions. — It shall be unlawful for any manufacturer, bottler, or wholesaler of any alcoholic beverages, or for any officer, director, or affiliate thereof, either directly or indirectly to:

Require that an alcoholic beverage retailer purchase any alcoholic beverages from that person to the full or partial exclusion of any other alcoholic beverages offered for sale by other persons in this State; or

Have any direct or indirect financial interest in the business of any alcoholic beverage retailer in this State or in the premises where the business of any alcoholic beverage retailer in this State is conducted; or

Lend or give to any alcoholic beverage retailer in this State or his employee or to the owner of the premises where the business of any alcoholic beverage retailer in this State is conducted, any money, service, equipment, furniture, fixtures or any other thing of value.A brewery qualifying under subdivision (7) or (8) of

G.S. 18B-1104(a)

is not subject to the provisions of this section concerning financial interests in, and lending or giving things of value to, a wholesaler or retailer with respect to the brewery’s transactions with the retail business on its premises or other retail locations allowed under

G.S. 18B-1104(a)

(8). The brewery is subject to the provisions of this subsection, however, with respect to its transactions with all other wholesalers and retailers.A distillery is not subject to the provisions of this section concerning financial interests in, and lending or giving things of value to, a retailer with respect to the distillery’s transactions with the retail business allowed on its premises under G.S. 18B-1105(a)(4). The distillery is subject to the provisions of this subsection, however, with respect to its transactions with all other retailers.

Exemptions. — The Commission may grant exemptions from the provisions of this section. Any exemption entered by the Commission in which any brewery or any officer, director, or affiliate of the brewery has a direct or indirect financial interest in the business of any retailer beyond the number of additional retail locations authorized by

G.S. 18B-1104

shall prohibit the brewery’s malt beverages from being sold to or purchased by that retailer. In determining whether to grant an exemption, the Commission shall consider the public welfare, the quantity and value of articles involved, established trade customs not contrary to the public interest, and the purposes of this section.

As used in this section, the phrase “giving things of value” shall not include the dividing or removing of individual containers of alcohol from larger packages of alcohol or the delivery of such to the retail permittee.

History.

1945, c. 708, s. 6; 1953, c. 1207, s. 1; 1971, c. 872, s. 1; 1981, c. 412, s. 2; c. 747, s. 63; 1993, c. 415, s. 25; 2005-380, s. 3; 2014-115, s. 28.2(c); 2017-87, ss. 11, 16(f); 2019-18, s. 3; 2019-182, s. 4(b).

§ 18B-1117.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 142, s. 3.

§ 18B-1118.
Purchase restrictions.

The holder of a malt beverage wholesaler, wine wholesaler, malt beverage importer, wine importer, or bottler permit may not purchase malt beverages or wine for resale in this State from a nonresident who does not have the proper nonresident vendor permit.

History.

1985, c. 114, s. 3.

§ 18B-1119.
Supplier’s financial interest in wholesaler.

A supplier or an officer, director, employee or affiliate of a supplier may not acquire, possess, or otherwise maintain an ownership interest in its wholesaler except as expressly authorized by this Chapter.

Repealed by Session Laws 2018-100, s. 7(b), effective June 26, 2018.

A supplier or an officer, director, employee or affiliate of a supplier may have a security interest in the inventory or property of its wholesaler to secure payment for such inventory or other loans for other purposes.

For purposes of this section, “supplier” means a manufacturer, bottler, importer, or owner of one or more brands of malt beverages, unfortified wine, or fortified wine distributed by its wholesaler. The term “supplier” does not include a wholesaler that meets either of the following criteria:

The wholesaler also possesses a wine importer permit or a malt beverages importer permit issued pursuant to this Chapter.

The wholesaler is an importer in another state, provided such malt beverages, unfortified wine, or fortified wine are transferred to it through an unaffiliated and independent third party.

History.

1989, c. 142, s. 2; 2018-100, s. 7(b); 2022-1, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2018-100, s. 7(b), effective June 26, 2018, rewrote subsection (a), and deleted subsection (b).

Session Laws 2022-1, s. 5, substituted “its wholesaler” for “a wholesaler” in subsection (a), and added subsection (d).

§ 18B-1120.
Noncontiguous storage locations.

A brewery, winery, or distillery may store any alcoholic beverages it manufactures pursuant to a permit issued under this Article at a noncontiguous storage location approved by the Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau. The permittee must notify the Commission of any storage location used pursuant to this section. Any storage location used pursuant to this section shall be considered part of the premises of the brewery, winery, or distillery manufacturing the alcoholic beverages.

History.

2017-87, s. 6.

§ 18B-1121.
Authority to sample for sensory analysis, quality control, or educational purposes.

Except as otherwise prohibited under Article 3 of this Chapter, a commercial permittee licensed under this Article, or its agent or employee, may consume samples of alcoholic beverages it is licensed to sell, free of charge, for purposes of sensory analysis, quality control, or education on any of the following premises:

The permittee’s premises licensed for commercial activity under Article 11 of this Chapter.

The permittee’s premises licensed for retail activity under Article 10 of this Chapter, if the commercial permittee is authorized to hold a retail permit under Article 11 of this Chapter and the commercial permittee has obtained the appropriate retail permit under

G.S. 18B-1001

.

The premises of a special one-time permittee under

G.S. 18B-1002

.

The premises of a special event where a commercial permittee is participating pursuant to a permit issued under

G.S. 18B-1114.1

or

G.S. 18B-1114.5

.

History.

2017-87, s. 9; 2018-100, s. 1.

§§ 18B-1122 through 18B-1199.

Reserved for future codification purposes.